North Carolina statutes. Chapter 163. Elections and Election Laws.
Article 20. Absentee Ballot.
§ 163-227.6.
Sites and hours for one-stop voting.

Notwithstanding any other provision of

G.S. 163-227.2

, 163-227.5, and this section, a county board of elections by unanimous vote of all its members may provide for one or more sites in that county for absentee ballots to be applied for and cast under these sections.
Every individual staffing any of those sites shall be a member or full-time employee of the county board of elections or an employee of the county board of elections whom the board has given training equivalent to that given a
full-time employee. Those sites must be approved by the State Board as part of a Plan for Implementation approved by both the county board of elections and by the State Board which shall also provide adequate security of the ballots
and provisions to avoid allowing persons to vote who have already voted. The Plan for Implementation shall include a provision for the presence of political party observers at each one-stop site equivalent to the provisions in

G.S. 163-45

for party observers at voting places on election day. A county board of elections may propose in its Plan not to offer one-stop voting at the county board of elections office; the State Board may approve that proposal
in a Plan only if the Plan includes at least one site reasonably proximate to the county board of elections office and the State Board finds that the sites in the Plan as a whole provide adequate coverage of the county’s electorate.
If a county board of elections has considered a proposed Plan or Plans for Implementation and has been unable to reach unanimity in favor of a Plan, a member or members of that county board of elections may petition the State Board
to adopt a plan for it. If petitioned, the State Board may also receive and consider alternative petitions from another member or members of that county board. The State Board may adopt a Plan for that county. The State Board,
in that plan, shall take into consideration whether the Plan disproportionately favors any party, racial or ethnic group, or candidate.

The State Board shall not approve, either in a Plan approved unanimously by a county board of elections or in an alternative Plan proposed by a member or members of that board, a one-stop site in a building that the county board of elections is not entitled
under

G.S. 163-129

to demand and use as an election-day voting place, unless the State Board finds that other equally suitable sites were not available and that the use of the sites chosen will not disproportionately favor any party,
racial or ethnic group, or candidate. In providing the site or sites for one-stop absentee voting under

G.S. 163-227.2

, 163-227.5, and this section, the county board of elections shall make a request to the State, county, city, local school board, or other entity in control of the building that is supported or maintained, in whole
or in part, by or through tax revenues at least 90 days prior to the start of one-stop absentee voting under these sections. The request shall clearly identify the building, or any specific portion thereof, requested the dates
and times for which that building or specific portion thereof is requested and the requirement of an area for election related activity. If the State, local governing board, or other entity in control of the building does not respond
to the request within 20 days, the building or specific portion thereof may be used for one-stop absentee voting as stated in the request. If the State, local governing board, or other entity in control of the building or specific
portion thereof responds negatively to the request within 20 days, that entity and the county board of elections shall, in good faith, work to identify a building or specific portion thereof in which to conduct one-stop absentee
voting under 163-227.2, 163-227.5, and this section. If no building or specific portion thereof has been agreed upon within 45 days from the date the county board of elections received a response to the request, the matter shall
be resolved by the State Board.

For all sites approved for one-stop voting under this section, a county board of elections shall provide the following:

Each one-stop site across the county shall be open at that same location during the period required by G.S. 163-227.2(b).

If any one-stop site across the county is opened on any day during the period required by G.S. 163-227.2(b), all one-stop sites shall be open on that day.

On each weekday during the period required by G.S. 163-227.2(b), all one-stop sites shall be open from 8:00 A.M. to 7:30 P.M.

If the county board of elections opens one-stop sites on Saturdays other than the last Saturday before the election during the period required by G.S. 163-227.2(b), then all one-stop sites shall be open for the same number of hours uniformly throughout
the county on those Saturdays.

If the county board of elections opens one-stop sites on Sundays during the period required by G.S. 163-227.2(b), then all one-stop sites shall be open for the same number of hours uniformly throughout the county on those Sundays.

All one-stop sites shall be open on the last Saturday before the election, for the hours required under G.S. 163-227.2(b) for that last Saturday.

Notwithstanding subsection (c) of this section, a county board of elections by unanimous vote of all its members may propose a Plan for Implementation providing for the number of sites set out below in that county for absentee ballots to be applied for
and cast with days and hours that vary from the county board of elections, or its alternate, and other additional one-stop sites in that county. If the county board of elections is unable to reach unanimity in favor of a Plan for
Implementation, a member or members of the county board of elections may petition the State Board to adopt a plan for the county and the State Board may adopt a Plan for Implementation for that county. However, any Plan of Implementation
approved under this subsection shall provide for uniform location, days, and hours for that one site throughout the period required by G.S. 163-227.2(b). This subsection applies only to a county that meets any of the following:

One site in a county that includes a barrier island, which barrier island meets all of the following conditions:

It has permanent inhabitation of residents residing in an unincorporated area.

It is bounded on the east by the Atlantic Ocean and on the west by a coastal sound.

It contains either a National Wildlife Refuge or a portion of a National Seashore.

It has no bridge access to the mainland of the county and is only accessible by marine vessel.

Up to two sites in a county that is bounded by the largest sound on the East Coast and the county seat is located at the intersection of two rivers, which divide the county.

Notwithstanding

G.S. 163-227.2

and subdivisions (c)(2) and (c)(3) of this section, a county board of elections by unanimous vote of all its members may propose a Plan for Implementation providing for sites in that county for absentee ballots to
be applied for and cast in elections conducted in odd-numbered years. The proposed Plan for Implementation shall specify the hours of operation for the county board of elections for an election conducted in that county for that
odd-numbered year. If the county board of elections is unable to reach unanimity in favor of a Plan for Implementation for that odd-numbered year, a member or members of the county board of elections may petition the State Board
to adopt a Plan for Implementation for the county, and the State Board may adopt a Plan for Implementation for that county. However, throughout the period required by

G.S. 163-227.2

(b), any Plan of Implementation approved under this subsection shall provide for a minimum of regular business hours consistent with daily hours presently observed by the county board of elections for the county
board of elections, or its alternate, and for uniform locations, days, and hours for all other additional one-stop sites in that county.

History.
1973, c. 536, s. 1; 1975, c. 844, s. 12; 1977, c. 469, s. 1; c. 626, s. 1; 1979, c. 107, s. 14; c. 799, ss. 1-3; 1981, c. 305, s. 2; 1985, c. 600, s. 4; 1987, c. 583, s. 4; 1989, c. 520; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 991,
s. 2; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 762, s. 53; 1995, c. 243, s. 1; c. 509, ss. 117, 118; 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 561, s. 4; 1997-510, s. 2; 1999-455, s. 6; 2000-136, s. 2; 2001-319, s. 5(a)-(c); 2001-337, s. 2; 2001-353, s. 9; 2003-278,
s. 11; 2005-428, ss. 5(a), 6(a), 7; 2007-253, s. 3; 2007-391, s. 34(a); 2009-541, s. 23; 2013-381, ss. 2.7, 16.5, 25.1, 25.2, 25.3, 30.7; 2014-111, s. 3; 2015-103, ss 6(b), 8(b), (c); 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-112, s. 2; 2018-129, ss. 1(b),
2; 2018-144, s. 3.4(g); 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b); 2019-22, ss. 7, 7.5(a), (b); 2019-239, s. 2(b).

Local Modification.

Durham: 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 717, s. 1; Gaston: 1995, c. 197, s. 1; Guilford: 1995, c. 197, s. 1; Mecklenburg: 1995, c. 197, s. 1; Orange: 1983, c. 192; 1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 978; Pasquotank: 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 568, s. 1; Randolph:
1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 717, s. 1; Union County: 1995, c. 197, s. 1; Wake: 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 717, s. 1; Watauga: 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 717, s. 1; Wilson: 1995 (Reg. Sess. 1996), c. 599, s. 1; town of Columbia: 2011-132;
Anson County Board of Commissioners: 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 781, s. 9 (but shall only be enforced as provided by Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965).

Cross References.

As to in-person registration and voting at one-stop absentee voting sites, see

G.S. 163-82.6

A.

Prior Law in Force.

In the case of NAACP v. McCrory, the defendants were enjoined from implementing certain portions of Session Laws 2013-381 and Session Laws 2015-103, relating to photo IDs and changes to early voting, same-day registration, out-of-precinct voting, and
preregistration, and the pertinent statutory provisions in effect prior to those amendments were declared to be in full force (Case 1:13-cv-00658-TDS-JEP Document 455 (M.D.N.C. 2016). In a letter dated October 5, 2017, the Revisor
was informed that as a result, the version of this section that the State Board was actually enforcing is as follows:

§ 163-227.2. Alternate procedures for requesting application for absentee ballot; “one-stop” voting procedure in board office

Any voter eligible to vote by absentee ballot under

G.S. 163-226

may request an application for absentee ballots, complete the application, and vote under the provisions of this section and of

G.S. 163-82.6

A, as applicable.

Not earlier than the third Thursday before an election, in which absentee ballots are authorized, in which a voter seeks to vote and not later than 1:00 P.M. on the last Saturday before that election, the voter shall appear in person only at the office
of the county board of elections, provided in subsection (g) of this section. A county board of elections shall conduct one-stop voting on the last Saturday before the election until 1:00 P.M. and may conduct it until 5:00 P.M.
on that Saturday. That voter shall enter the voting enclosure at the board office through the appropriate entrance and shall at once state his or her name and place of residence to an authorized member or employee of the board.

If the application is properly filled out, the authorized member or employee shall enter the voter’s name in the register of absentee requests, applications, and ballots issued and shall furnish the voter with the ballots to which the application for
absentee ballots applies. The voter thereupon shall vote in accordance with subsection (e) of this section.

Only the chairman, member, employee, or director of elections of the board shall keep the voter’s application for absentee ballots in a safe place, separate and apart from other applications and container-return envelopes. If the voter’s application for
absentee ballots is disapproved by the board, the board shall so notify the voter stating the reason for disapproval by first-class mail addressed to the voter at that voter’s residence address and at the address shown in the application
for absentee ballots; and the board shall enter a challenge under

G.S. 163-89

.

The voter shall vote that voter’s absentee ballot in a voting booth in the office of the county board of elections, and the county board of elections shall provide a voting booth for that purpose, provided however, that the county board of elections may
in the alternative provide a private room for the voter adjacent to the office of the board, in which case the voter shall vote that voter’s absentee ballot in that room. A voter at a one-stop site shall be entitled to the same
assistance as a voter at a voting place on election day under

G.S. 163-166.8

. The State Board of Elections shall, where appropriate, adapt the rules it adopts under

G.S. 163-166.8

to one-stop voting.

Notwithstanding the exception specified in

G.S. 163-36

, counties which operate a modified full-time office shall remain open five days each week during regular business hours consistent with daily hours presently observed by the county board of elections, commencing
with the date prescribed in G.S. 163-227.2(b) and continuing until 5:00 P.M. on the Friday prior to that election and shall also be open on the last Saturday before the election. A county board may conduct one-stop absentee voting
during evenings or on weekends, as long as the hours are part of a plan submitted and approved according to subsection (g) of this section. The boards of county commissioners shall provide necessary funds for the additional operation
of the office during that time.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, a county board of elections by unanimous vote of all its members may provide for one or more sites in that county for absentee ballots to be applied for and cast under this section. Every individual
staffing any of those sites shall be a member or full-time employee of the county board of elections or an employee of the county board of elections whom the board has given training equivalent to that given a full-time employee.
Those sites must be approved by the State Board of Elections as part of a Plan for Implementation approved by both the county board of elections and by the State Board of Elections which shall also provide adequate security of
the ballots and provisions to avoid allowing persons to vote who have already voted. The Plan for Implementation shall include a provision for the presence of political party observers at each one-stop site equivalent to the provisions
in

G.S. 163-45

for party observers at voting places on election day. A county board of elections may propose in its Plan not to offer one-stop voting at the county board of elections office; the State Board may approve that proposal
in a Plan only if the Plan includes at least one site reasonably proximate to the county board of elections office and the State Board finds that the sites in the Plan as a whole provide adequate coverage of the county’s electorate.
If a county board of elections has considered a proposed Plan or Plans for Implementation and has been unable to reach unanimity in favor of a Plan, a member or members of that county board of elections may petition the State Board
of Elections to adopt a plan for it. If petitioned, the State Board may also receive and consider alternative petitions from another member or members of that county board. The State Board of Elections may adopt a Plan for that
county. The State Board, in that plan, shall take into consideration factors including geographic, demographic, and partisan interests of that county.

Notwithstanding the provisions of G.S. 163-89(a) and (b), a challenge may be entered against a voter at a one-stop site under subsection (g) of this section or during one-stop voting at the county board office. The challenge may be entered by a person
conducting one-stop voting under this section or by another registered voter who resides in the same precinct as the voter being challenged. If challenged at the place where one-stop voting occurs, the voter shall be allowed to
cast a ballot in the same way as other voters. The challenge shall be made on forms prescribed by the State Board of Elections. The challenge shall be heard by the county board of elections in accordance with the procedures set
forth in G.S. 163-89(e).

At any site where one-stop absentee voting is conducted, there shall be a curtained or otherwise private area where the voter may mark the ballot unobserved.

(a1) Repealed by Session Laws 2001-337, s. 2, effective January 1, 2002.

In a primary election, the voter shall also state the political party with which the voter affiliates and in whose primary the voter desires to vote, or if the voter is an unaffiliated voter permitted to vote in the primary of a particular party under

G.S. 163-119

, the voter shall state the name of the authorizing political party in whose primary he wishes to vote. The board member or employee to whom the voter gives this information shall announce the name and residence of the
voter in a distinct tone of voice. After examining the registration records, an employee of the board shall state whether the person seeking to vote is duly registered. If the voter is found to be registered that voter may request
that the authorized member or employee of the board furnish the voter with an application form as specified in

G.S. 163-227

. The voter shall complete the application in the presence of the authorized member or employee of the board, and shall deliver the application to that person.

All actions required by this subsection shall be performed in the office of the board of elections, except that the voting may take place in an adjacent room as provided by subsection (e) of this section. The application under this subsection shall be
signed in the presence of the chair, member, director of elections of the board, or full-time employee, authorized by the board who shall sign the application and certificate as the witness and indicate the official title held by him
or her. Notwithstanding G.S. 163-231(a), in the case of this subsection, only one witness shall be required on the certificate.

(e1)

(Effective until December 1, 2019 — see note)
If a county uses a voting system with retrievable ballots, that county’s board of elections may by resolution elect to conduct one-stop absentee voting according to the provisions of this subsection. In a county in which
the board has opted to do so, a one-stop voter shall cast the ballot and then shall deposit the ballot in the ballot box or voting system in the same manner as if such box or system was in use in a precinct on election day. At the
end of each business day, or at any time when there will be no employee or officer of the board of elections on the premises, the ballot box or system shall be secured in accordance with a plan approved by the State Board of Elections,
which shall include that no additional ballots have been placed in the box or system. Any county board desiring to conduct one-stop voting according to this subsection shall submit a plan for doing so to the State Board of Elections.
The State Board shall adopt standards for conducting one-stop voting under this subsection and shall approve any county plan that adheres to its standards. The county board shall adhere to its State Board-approved plan. The plan shall
provide that each one-stop ballot shall have a ballot number on it in accordance with G.S. 163-230.1(a2), or shall have an equivalent identifier to allow for retrievability. The standards shall address retrievability in one-stop voting
on direct record electronic equipment where no paper ballot is used.

(e1)

(Effective December 1, 2019 — see note)
If a county uses a voting system with retrievable ballots, that county’s board of elections may by resolution elect to conduct one-stop absentee voting according to the provisions of this subsection. In a county in which
the board has opted to do so, a one-stop voter shall cast the ballot and then shall deposit the ballot in the ballot box or voting system in the same manner as if such box or system was in use in a precinct on election day. At the
end of each business day, or at any time when there will be no employee or officer of the board of elections on the premises, the ballot box or system shall be secured in accordance with a plan approved by the State Board of Elections,
which shall include that no additional ballots have been placed in the box or system. Any county board desiring to conduct one-stop voting according to this subsection shall submit a plan for doing so to the State Board of Elections.
The State Board shall adopt standards for conducting one-stop voting under this subsection and shall approve any county plan that adheres to its standards. The county board shall adhere to its State Board-approved plan. The plan shall
provide that each one-stop ballot shall have a ballot number on it in accordance with G.S. 163-230.1(a2), or shall have an equivalent identifier to allow for retrievability.

(e2) A voter who has moved within the county more than 30 days before election day but has not reported the move to the board of elections shall not be required on that account to vote a provisional ballot at the one-stop site, as long as the one-stop
site has available all the information necessary to determine whether a voter is registered to vote in the county and which ballot the voter is eligible to vote based on the voter’s proper residence address. The voter with that kind
of unreported move shall be allowed to vote the same kind of absentee ballot as other one-stop voters. (f) Notwithstanding the exception specified in

G.S. 163-36

, counties which operate a modified full-time office shall remain open five days each week during regular business hours consistent with daily hours presently observed by the county board of elections, commencing with
the date prescribed in G.S. 163-227.2(b) and continuing until 5:00 P.M. on the Friday prior to that election and shall also be open on the last Saturday before the election. A county board may conduct one-stop absentee voting during
evenings or on weekends, as long as the hours are part of a plan submitted and approved according to subsection (g) of this section. The boards of county commissioners shall provide necessary funds for the additional operation of the
office during that time.

(g1) The State Board of Elections shall not approve, either in a Plan approved unanimously by a county board of elections or in an alternative Plan proposed by a member or members of that board, a one-stop site in a building that the county board of elections
is not entitled under

G.S. 163-129

to demand and use as an election-day voting place, unless the State Board of Elections finds that other equally suitable sites were not available and that the use of the sites chosen will not unfairly advantage or disadvantage
geographic, demographic, or partisan interests of that county. In providing the site or sites for one-stop absentee voting under this section, the county board of elections shall make a request to the State, county, city, local school
board, or other entity in control of the building that is supported or maintained, in whole or in part, by or through tax revenues at least 90 days prior to the start of one-stop absentee voting under this section. The request shall
clearly identify the building, or any specific portion thereof, requested the dates and times for which that building or specific portion thereof is requested and the requirement of an area for election related activity. If the State,
local governing board, or other entity in control of the building does not respond to the request within 20 days, the building or specific portion thereof may be used for one-stop absentee voting as stated in the request. If the State,
local governing board, or other entity in control of the building or specific portion thereof responds negatively to the request within 20 days, that entity and the county board of elections shall, in good faith, work to identify a
building or specific portion thereof in which to conduct one-stop absentee voting under this section. If no building or specific portion thereof has been agreed upon within 45 days from the date the county board of elections received
a response to the request, the matter shall be resolved by the State Board of Elections.

§§ 163-227.7 through 163-227.9.

Reserved for future codification.

§ 163-227.10.
Date by which absentee ballots must be available for voting.

A board of elections shall provide absentee ballots of the kinds needed 60 days prior to the statewide general election in even-numbered years and 50 days prior to the date on which any other election shall be conducted, unless 45 days is authorized by
the State Board under G.S. 163-22(k) or there shall exist an appeal before the State Board or the courts not concluded, in which case the board shall provide the ballots as quickly as possible upon the conclusion of such an appeal.
Provided, in a presidential election year, the board of elections shall provide general election ballots no later than three days after nomination of the presidential and vice presidential candidates if that nomination occurs later
than 63 days prior to the statewide general election and makes compliance with the 60-day deadline impossible. However, in the case of municipal elections, absentee ballots shall be made available no later than 30 days before an
election. In every instance the board of elections shall exert every effort to provide absentee ballots, of the kinds needed by the date on which absentee voting is authorized to commence.

Second Primary. — The board of elections shall provide absentee ballots, of the kinds needed, as quickly as possible after the ballot information for a second primary has been determined.

History.
1973, c. 1275; 1977, c. 469, s. 1; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 986, s. 2; 1987, c. 485, ss. 2, 5; c. 509, s. 9; 1989, c. 635, s. 5; 2001-353, s. 4; 2002-159, s. 55(i); 2009-537, s. 2; 2013-381, s. 17(a); 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146,
s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-228.
Register of absentee requests, applications, and ballots issued; a public record.

With respect to each request for mail-in absentee ballots, the State Board shall approve an official register in which the county board of elections in each county of the State shall record the following information:

Name of voter for whom application and ballots are being requested, and, if applicable, the name and address of the voter’s near relative or verifiable legal guardian who requested the application and ballots for the voter.

Number of assigned voter’s application when issued.

Precinct in which the applicant is registered.

Address to which ballots are to be mailed.

Repealed by Session Laws 2009-537, s. 3, effective January 1, 2010, and applicable with respect to elections held on or after that date.

Date request for application for ballots is received by the county board of elections.

The voter’s party affiliation.

The date the ballots were mailed or delivered to the voter.

Whatever additional information and official action may be required by this Article. (a1) With respect to each early “one-stop” absentee ballot voted under

G.S. 163-227.2

, 163-227.5, and 163-227.6, the State Board shall approve an official register in which the county board of elections in each county of the State shall record the following information:

(1) Name of voter for whom application and ballots are being requested.

(2) Number of assigned voter’s application when issued.

(3) The precinct in which the voter is registered.

(4) The date the voter voted early “one-stop.”

(5) The voter’s party affiliation.

(6) Whatever additional information and official action may be required by this Article.

The State Board may provide for the official registers required by this section to be kept by electronic data processing equipment.

The official register required by subsection (a) of this section shall be confidential and not a public record until the opening of the voting place in accordance with

G.S. 163-166.01

, at which time the official register shall constitute a public record. The official register required by subsection (a1) of this section shall constitute a public record and shall be opened to the inspection of
any registered voter of the county within 60 days before and 30 days after an election in which absentee ballots were authorized, or at any other time when good and sufficient reason may be assigned for its inspection.

The State Board shall require the county board of elections to transmit information in the official register provided for in this section and the list required by

G.S. 163-232

to the State Board. The State Board shall adopt rules to implement this subsection, including frequency of transmittal.

Notwithstanding subsection (c) of this section, the State Board or a county board of elections shall inform the voter of the status of that voter’s request for mail-in absentee ballots upon inquiry of the voter or the voter’s near relative or verifiable
legal guardian.

History.
1939, c. 159, ss. 3, 9; 1945, c. 758, s. 8; 1953, c. 1114; 1963, c. 457, s. 3; 1965, c. 1208; 1967, c. 775, s. 1; c. 952, s. 4; 1973, c. 536, s. 1; 1977, c. 469, s. 1; 1991, c. 636, s. 21; 1999-455, s. 7; 2009-537, s. 3;
2017-6, s. 3; 2018-144, s. 3.4(h); 2018-146, ss. 3.1(a), (b), 4.9; 2019-239, s. 1.1(a).

§ 163-229.
Absentee ballots, applications on container-return envelopes, and instruction sheets.

Absentee Ballot Form. — In accordance with the provisions of

G.S. 163-230.1

, persons entitled to vote by absentee ballot shall be furnished with official ballots.

Application on Container-Return Envelope. — In time for use not later than 60 days before a statewide general election in an even-numbered year, and not later than 50 days before a statewide primary, other general election or county bond election, the
county board of elections shall print a sufficient number of envelopes in which persons casting absentee ballots may transmit their marked ballots to the county board of elections. However, in the case of municipal elections, sufficient
container-return envelopes shall be made available no later than 30 days before an election. Each container-return envelope shall have printed on it an application which shall be designed and prescribed by the State Board, providing
for all of the following:

The voter’s certification of eligibility to vote the enclosed ballot and of having voted the enclosed ballot in accordance with this Part.

A space for identification of the envelope with the voter and the voter’s signature.

A space for the identification of the two persons witnessing the casting of the absentee ballot in accordance with

G.S. 163-231

, those persons’ signatures, and those persons’ addresses.

A space for the name and address of any person who, as permitted under

G.S. 163-226.3

(a), assisted the voter if the voter is unable to complete and sign the certification and that individual’s signature.

A space for approval by the county board of elections.

A space to allow reporting of a change of name as provided by

G.S. 163-82.16

.

A prominent display of the unlawful acts under

G.S. 163-226.3

and

G.S. 163-275

, except if there is not room on the envelope, the State Board may provide for that disclosure to be made on a separate piece of paper to be included along with the container-return envelope.

An area to attach additional documentation necessary to comply with the identification requirements in accordance with State Board rules, as provided in

G.S. 163-230.1

.

A bar code or other unique identifier to allow both the county board of elections and the voter to track the ballot following return of the voted ballot to the county board of elections by the voter.The container-return envelope shall be printed in accordance
with the instructions of the State Board, which shall prohibit the display of the voter’s party affiliation on the outside of the container-return envelope.

Instruction Sheets. — In time for use not later than 60 days before a statewide general election in an even-numbered year, and not later than 50 days before a statewide primary, other general or county bond election, the county board of elections shall
prepare and print a sufficient number of sheets of instructions on how voters are to prepare absentee ballots and return them to the county board of elections. However, in the case of municipal elections, instruction sheets shall
be made available no later than 30 days before an election.

History.
1929, c. 164, s. 39; 1939, c. 159, ss. 3, 4; 1943, c. 751, s. 2; 1963, c. 457, ss. 3, 4; 1965, c. 1208; 1967, c. 775, s. 1; c. 851, s. 1; c. 952, s. 5; 1973, c. 536, s. 1; 1975, c. 844, s. 13; 1977, c. 469, s. 1; 1985, c.
562, ss. 3, 4; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 986, s. 2; 1987, c. 485, ss. 2, 5; c. 509, s. 9; c. 583, s. 3; 1989, c. 635, s. 5; 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 561, s. 5; 1999-455, s. 8; 2009-537, s. 4; 2013-381, s. 4.1; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-144,
s. 1.2(d); 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b); 2019-239, s. 1.4; 2020-17, s. 3(a).

§ 163-230.
[Repealed]

(/u)
Repealed by Session Laws 1999-455, s. 9, effective January 1, 2000.